Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-121
Annual meeting of water users; petition.

Upon petition signed by ten percent of the water users of any irrigation district and lodged with the president of such district or with any other officer during the absence or disability of the president for any cause, the president or other officer of such district shall call an annual meeting of the water users of the district upon notice given in the usual manner for elections therein, where reports of the manager, secretary, and board of directors shall be made and the general policies of the irrigation district shall be discussed.

Laws 1923, c. 97, § 2, p. 247;

Laws 1927, c. 142, § 1, p. 386;

C.S.1929, § 46-109;

R.S.1943, § 46-121.